



Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC | Wealth Management Advice








Client Login →24 Federal Street, 10th FloorBoston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300Fax: 617-502-8310
Menu



Home
About Birch Hill
Client Service
Investment Approach
Team
Commentaries
BH News
Contact







Welcome to Birch Hill
Birch Hill manages investments and provides wealth management advice for individuals, families, trusts and institutions.
Successive generations of families have depended on us to manage their wealth – a testimony to the trust we build and the confidence we work to achieve every day.

How We Work With You
Commitment to our Clients
Commitment to our Community

View our most recent commentary:
July 2017 Market View





Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
	  24 Federal Street, 10th Floor | Boston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300 | Fax: 617-502-8310 | BirchHillAdvisors.comWebsite Design by Cold Spring Design | Photos by Erb Photography | Legal Notices












About Birch Hill Investment Advisors | Independently Owned | Integrity








Client Login →24 Federal Street, 10th FloorBoston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300Fax: 617-502-8310
Menu



Home
About Birch Hill
Client Service
Investment Approach
Team
Commentaries
BH News
Contact





About Birch Hill
Independent and unbiased
Birch Hill is an independent Registered Investment Advisor wholly owned by our principals.  We are not distracted or compromised by outside owners.  Our structure enables us to be flexible in providing the service you need, to make decisions expeditiously and to be attentive to your specific objectives.
Broad experience and sincere commitment
With broad experience in investment research, portfolio management, taxation and trust administration, we are committed to delivering the advice most appropriate for you.  Birch Hill’s Principals have a long history of working successfully with clients and coordinating financial solutions with their attorneys, accountants and other professionals.
Straightforward advice and access
We deliver straightforward unbiased advice, and our clients have direct access to the Principal who manages their portfolio.  An independent custodian provides full account transparency.
Integrity
We are committed to operating our business with integrity.  Our Principals include three Chartered Financial Analysts and an attorney who are dedicated to the highest ethical and fiduciary standards.




About Birch Hill
Commitment to our Clients
History


 



Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
	  24 Federal Street, 10th Floor | Boston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300 | Fax: 617-502-8310 | BirchHillAdvisors.comWebsite Design by Cold Spring Design | Photos by Erb Photography | Legal Notices











Contact | Directions | Birch Hill Investment Advisors








Client Login →24 Federal Street, 10th FloorBoston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300Fax: 617-502-8310
Menu



Home
About Birch Hill
Client Service
Investment Approach
Team
Commentaries
BH News
Contact




Contact Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
					24 Federal Street, 10th Floor
				Boston, MA 02110
Phone: 617-502-8300
					Fax: 617-502-8310
info@birchhilladvisors.com
Directions to Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC

View Larger Map

View Larger Map
We suggest using the Garage at Post Office Square to park nearby.
Walking directions from the Garage at Post Office Square:

Turn right at the top of the escalator
Head west on Franklin St toward Congress St
Turn right at Congress St
Our building, 24 Federal St, has an entrance on Congress St as well as
					  an entrance on Federal St
We are located on the 10th floor.

Click for a printable PDF with directions that will take you to convenient parking and then directly to our Federal St. office.





Congress St Entrance - View Larger Map


Federal St Entrance - View Larger Map


 



Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
	  24 Federal Street, 10th Floor | Boston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300 | Fax: 617-502-8310 | BirchHillAdvisors.comWebsite Design by Cold Spring Design | Photos by Erb Photography | Legal Notices












Client Service | Birch Hill Investment | Trusted Financial Advisor








Client Login →24 Federal Street, 10th FloorBoston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300Fax: 617-502-8310
Menu



Home
About Birch Hill
Client Service
Investment Approach
Team
Commentaries
BH News
Contact





Client Service
Our clients consider us a trusted advisor and appreciate the attentive and personalized service that we provide.
As a client, you enjoy direct attention from a Principal with another Principal as back up.
In addition to developing an investment plan to meet your goals, we frequently counsel clients beyond their portfolios, including coordination with income taxes, estate plans, and outside accounts, including employee benefit plans and family trusts.
We work with you to design a communication plan that meets your needs, including periodic meetings, written reviews, telephone conversations and emails.




Client Service
How We Work With You


 



Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
	  24 Federal Street, 10th Floor | Boston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300 | Fax: 617-502-8310 | BirchHillAdvisors.comWebsite Design by Cold Spring Design | Photos by Erb Photography | Legal Notices











Commentaries | Birch Hill Investment Advisors | Market View | Economy








Client Login →24 Federal Street, 10th FloorBoston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300Fax: 617-502-8310
Menu



Home
About Birch Hill
Client Service
Investment Approach
Team
Commentaries
BH News
Contact




Commentaries

Market View
Jul 2017

Stock prices continued a steady, low volatility, march higher in the second quarter. With valuation levels somewhat above average, investors may be too complacent. The Federal Reserve seems intent on increasing short-term interest rates even in the face of very low inflation and economic growth. The eventual transition from the current low interest rate period to more normal rates may be painful for less-cautious investors but will likely lead to a period of stronger productivity and economic growth.Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Market View
Apr 2017

US stocks continued their strong performance into 2017 and ended the first quarter up 6.1%. Short term interest rates rose while longer rates were generally flat. In March the Federal Reserve raised the federal funds rate another 1/4 of 1% to a range of 0.75 to 1%. Clients are asking us: Why has the stock market done so well?Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Market View
Jan 2017

US stocks closed 2016 near record highs. Economic growth picked up in the latter part of the year and expectations are high for new pro-growth policies from Congress. Market volatility may rise as actual legislation is hammered out. Investors should stay the course.Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Market View
Oct 2016

US stocks produced attractive but uneven returns in the first nine months of 2016. Longer term interest rates declined, while shorter term rates increased modestly. Many developed nations continue to have sovereign debt trading at negative yields. Low global rates have pushed some investors to "reach for yield."Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Market View
July 2016

Challenged by weak economic growth and political uncertainties, global equity markets generally produced modest gains or lost ground in the first half of 2016. Longer term interest rates continued to decline. Britain's referendum in favor of leaving the European Union surprised the financial markets. Investors must remain disciplined during this period of economic uncertainty and difficult markets.Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Market View
April 2016

In the first quarter US stocks went on a wild ride, dropping 10% by mid-February then recovering to end the quarter just barely in positive territory. The stock market turmoil was one reason the Federal Reserve slowed its plan to raise short term interest rates. Most global economies are still growing slowly. US payrolls continue to expand at a healthy pace, and the consumer appears to be in good shape. The aging of the baby boomers is a secular trend that may reduce long term economic growth.Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Market View
January 2016

US stocks in 2015 had a bumpy sideways ride but fared better than most other markets. The Federal Reserve raised interest rates for the first time since the 2008 recession but rates still remain at exceptionally low levels. Most global economies remain mired in slow growth trajectories. The US consumer appears to be on solid footings. We address a few client questions regarding oil prices, interest rates and more.Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Market View
October 2015

The US stock market declined sharply during the third quarter as renewed concerns about global growth unsettled investors. After much anticipation, the US Federal Reserve decided
against raising interest rates at their September meeting. Oil prices remain low. US economic growth continues to outpace most other major economies. While market corrections can be uncomfortable, they can create several opportunities for long-term investors.Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Special Topics: Prenuptial Agreements

In the course of our careers we have had numerous conversations with clients and their children about the advisability of a prenuptial (also known as premarital or ante nuptial) agreement. Often these conversations were after an engagement was announced and a wedding date set, and the client or child of the client was unaware of the concept of such an agreement and found the conversation uncomfortable.

Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Special Topics: Paying for College

The annual cost of attending many private colleges now approaches or exceeds $60,000. While this cost will be reduced for many families through needs-based scholarships and tuition discounts, families with accumulated financial assets will spend close to the full amount. Here are six basic approaches to saving and paying for college.Download the complete commentary as a PDF
Special Topics: Avoiding Inheritance Mistakes

A substantial inheritance can have a life changing financial impact: if handled wisely, the elusive goals of financial security and a comfortable future retirement may become attainable. But sudden wealth can sometimes be overwhelming and, if not guarded carefully, can easily be eroded or destroyed. Avoiding the following common mistakes is key to your future financial wellbeing after receiving a substantial inheritance.Download the complete commentary as a PDF





Commentaries

July 2017 Market View
April 2017 Market View
January 2017 Market View
October 2016 Market View
July 2016 Market View
April 2016 Market View
January 2016 Market View
October 2015 Market View
Special Topics: Prenuptial Agreements
Special Topics: Paying for College
Special Topics: Avoiding Inheritance Mistakes




 



Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
    24 Federal Street, 10th Floor | Boston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300 | Fax: 617-502-8310 | BirchHillAdvisors.comWebsite Design by Cold Spring Design | Photos by Erb Photography | Legal Notices












Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC -  Personalized wealth management services









Client Login →24 Federal Street, 10th FloorBoston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300Fax: 617-502-8310
Menu



Home
About Birch Hill
Client Service
Investment Approach
Team
Commentaries
BH News
Contact




Legal Notices
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC Website Disclosure:
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC ("Birch Hill") is a registered investment adviser located in the State of Massachusetts. Birch Hill and its representatives are in compliance with the current registration requirements imposed upon investment advisers by those states in which Birch Hill maintains clients. Birch Hill may only transact business in those states in which it is registered or qualifies for an exemption or exclusion from registration requirements.
Birch Hill's web site is limited to the dissemination of general information regarding its investment advisory services to residents of the United States and residing in states where providing such information is not prohibited by applicable law. Accordingly, the publication of Birch Hill's web site on the Internet should not be construed by any consumer and/or prospective client as Birch Hill's solicitation to effect or attempt to effect transactions in securities or the rendering of personalized investment advice for compensation over the Internet.
Furthermore, the information resulting from the use of tools or other information on this Internet site should not be construed, in any manner whatsoever, as the receipt of, or a substitute for, personalized individual advice from Birch Hill. Any subsequent, direct communication by Birch Hill with a prospective client shall be conducted by a representative that is either registered or qualifies for an exemption or exclusion from registration in the state where the prospective client resides. For information pertaining to the registration status of Birch Hill, please contact the United States Securities and Exchange Commission on their web site at www.adviserinfo.sec.gov.
A copy of Birch Hill's current written disclosure statement discussing Birch Hill's business operations, services, and fees is available from Birch Hill upon written request. Birch Hill does not make any representations as to the accuracy, timeliness, suitability, completeness, or relevance of any information prepared by any unaffiliated third party, whether linked to Birch Hill's web site or incorporated herein and takes no responsibility therefore. All such information is provided solely for convenience purposes and all users thereof should be guided accordingly. 


 
 



Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
	  24 Federal Street, 10th Floor | Boston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300 | Fax: 617-502-8310 | BirchHillAdvisors.comWebsite Design by Cold Spring Design | Photos by Erb Photography | Legal Notices












Our Team | Boston's Five-Star Wealth Managers | Birch Hill Investment Advisors








Client Login →24 Federal Street, 10th FloorBoston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300Fax: 617-502-8310
Menu



Home
About Birch Hill
Client Service
Investment Approach
Team
Commentaries
BH News
Contact





Our Team
Birch Hill's founders Gary R. Mikula, CFA, Miner A. Crary, CFA, Robert 
          A. O'Neil, CFA, and Thomas E. Reilly Jr., JD are actively engaged 
          in managing investments for clients. As a team, we have over 100 years 
          combined experience working with clients and managing their financial 
          assets.
In working with clients Birch Hill follows a fiduciary standard—we always put our clients' interests above our own. As fiduciaries we have a duty of loyalty and care.

 
Gary R. Mikula, CFA, President & Co-Founder
Gary is a co-founder of Birch Hill and has thirty-seven years of experience managing investment portfolios for high net-worth individuals and small institutions. Prior to Birch Hill, Gary was a Managing Director at Seaward Management. Prior to Seaward, Gary was a Vice President and Investment Counselor for Eaton Vance Management. Gary also held positions at Webster Management in Boston and Hamilton Bank in Pennsylvania.
Gary received a BBA from Pennsylvania State University at Harrisburg. He has an MBA from Drexel University. He is a Chartered Financial Analyst and a member of the CFA Society Boston, the CFA Institute, and The Boston Economic Club. Gary is a Director of Friends of the Children Boston and a Trustee Emeritus of The Boston Conservatory. In 2017 Boston Magazine named Gary as one of Boston's Five-Star Wealth Managers.
Gary may be reached:

By phone at 617-502-8301
By email at GMikula@BirchHillAdvisors.com
Connect on 

 


Miner A. Crary, CFA, Founding Principal
Miner is a co-founder of Birch Hill and has thirty-six years of experience providing investment counseling and investment research for high net-worth clients. Prior to founding Birch Hill, Miner was a Managing Director at Seaward Management. Miner also held positions at P.D. Sinclair and Associates and started his career as an equity analyst at Liberty Mutual and Arkwright Insurance.
Miner has a BA from Amherst College, an MA from Tufts and an MBA from Boston University. He is a Chartered Financial Analyst and a member of the CFA Society Boston, the CFA Institute, and The Boston Economic Club. Miner is a Trustee of the Sudbury Foundation and a Trustee of the Wayside Inn Historical Site. He is a former Director and Treasurer of the Boston Security Analysts Society (now CFA Society Boston). He also served as an Overseer of the Bank of America Celebrity Series and was Co-Chair of its Investment Committee.
Miner may be reached:

By phone at 617-502-8304
By email at MCrary@BirchHillAdvisors.com
Connect on 

 


Robert A. O'Neil, Jr., CFA, Founding Principal
Rob is a co-founder of Birch Hill and has twenty-four years experience in the financial services industry. Rob's experience includes providing portfolio management, security analysis and financial advice to individuals and charitable groups. Prior to Birch Hill, Rob was a Managing Director at Seaward Management. Rob also was a Vice President and Investment Counselor at Eaton Vance Management. In addition, Rob held positions at Standish, Ayer & Wood and Investors Bank and Trust Company.
Rob has a BS from Bentley College and an MBA from the F.W. Olin Graduate School of Business at Babson College. He is a Chartered Financial Analyst and a member of the CFA Society Boston and the CFA Institute. Rob serves on the Board of Directors and the Investment Committee of the Louisa May Alcott Memorial Association. He is a Corporator for Emerson Hospital. Rob is also a member of the Investment Committee for The Foundation for MetroWest.
Rob may be reached:

By phone at 617-502-8302
By email at ROneil@BirchHillAdvisors.com
Connect on 

 


Thomas E. Reilly, Jr., JD, LLM, Founding Principal
Tom is a co-founder of Birch Hill and has been working with individuals, endowments, and foundations in the management of their accounts for forty-one years. Prior to founding Birch Hill, Tom was at Seaward Management for ten years as a Managing Director. From 1984 through 1997 he was a Portfolio Manager at the Boston Company where his positions included Head of the Boston Endowments and Foundations Group for Mellon Private Capital Management. He began his career in the late 1970s with the Private Client Group of Morgan Guaranty Trust Company of New York.
A graduate of Hamilton College, Tom holds a Juris Doctor from Albany Law School and an LLM in Taxation from New York University Graduate School of Law. He is a member of the New York Bar. Tom has been a Trustee of Crossroads for Kids since 1992 and has been on the Board of Directors of St. Francis House since 2010. In 2017 Boston Magazine named Tom as one of Boston's Five-Star Wealth Managers.
Tom may be reached:

By phone at 617-502-8303
By email at TReilly@BirchHillAdvisors.com
Connect on 

 


John B. Stiles, Principal
With fifteen years of experience in financial services, John is responsible for compliance systems management and trading at Birch Hill. Prior to joining Birch Hill, John was a Research Associate and Trader at Seaward Management. John began his career at Eaton Vance Management.
John is a graduate of Northeastern University where he participated in the Co-op program, holding various financial internships at State Street Bank, Mellon Financial, and Batterymarch Financial Management. He received his Masters of Science in Investment Management from Boston University. John is a member of the Boston Securities Traders Association and the National Society of Compliance Professionals. He serves as Chairman of the Board of Directors for AUG,The Exchange. John is also a Director and the Treasurer of Camp Fire Eastern Massachusetts.
John may be reached:

By phone at 617-502-8324
By email at JStiles@BirchHillAdvisors.com
Connect on 

 


Timothy M. Malloy, Vice President
Tim is primarily responsible for originating research and investment recommendations based on Birch Hill's investment discipline and in-depth due diligence process. Prior to joining Birch Hill, Tim worked as a Senior Portfolio Manager at Manulife Asset Management (John Hancock). Tim was the lead manager on a small cap strategy and co-manager of several funds including the John Hancock Balanced, Large Cap, and Global Opportunities Funds. The Global Opportunities Fund received the Lipper Fund Awards in 2011. Earlier in his career he worked in emerging markets with Baring Asset Management in Boston and Heritage Investments in Moscow, Russia.
Tim has over twenty-one years of investment experience. He earned a BS from Catholic University and an MBA from Boston College.
Tim may be reached:

By phone at 617-502-8330
By email at TMalloy@BirchHillAdvisors.com
Connect on 

 


Brett A. Mirliani, CFA, CFP®, Vice President
Brett's primary responsibility is marketing and new business efforts. He is also involved in Birch Hill's investment research process and assists in providing financial planning guidance. With twenty-one years in the financial services industry, Brett's experience includes business development, security analysis, portfolio management and financial advice to individuals. Prior to joining Birch Hill, Brett was a co-founder and Director of Client Relations at Granite Harbor Asset Management. He was also an equity analyst with Massachusetts Financial Services (MFS) and has held positions at Pinnacle Equity Solutions, Manning & Napier Advisors, and TD Waterhouse.
Brett has a BA from St. Lawrence University. He is a Chartered Financial Analyst and a member of the CFA Society Boston, and the CFA Institute. Brett is also a CERTIFIED FINANCIAL PLANNER™ practitioner. Brett serves on the Board of Directors of the Positive Coaching Alliance, and is on the leadership team of the New England Chapter of the Life Planning Network.
Brett may be reached:

By phone at 617-502-8322
By email at BrettM@BHBoston.com
Connect on 

 


Adam J. Desjardins, CFA, Vice President
Adam joined Birch Hill in 2007 and has ten years of experience in the financial services industry. Adam's experience includes security analysis, trading, performance measurement and portfolio accounting. Prior to Birch Hill, Adam was a performance measurement associate at State Street Bank.
Adam received a BA in Economics from California State University San Marcos and an MBA from Boston College. He is a Chartered Financial Analyst and a member of the CFA Society Boston, and the CFA Institute. He is a volunteer at the Boston Money Management Program and Big Brothers Big Sisters.
Adam may be reached:

By phone at 617-502-8323
By email at ADesjardins@BirchHillAdvisors.com
Connect on 

 
*For disclosures related to recognitions given to Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC and Birch Hill Principals, please click here.




Gary R. Mikula, 
			CFA
			President & Co-Founder
Miner A. Crary, 
					CFA
					Founding Principal
Robert A. O’Neil, Jr., 
			CFA
			Founding Principal
Thomas E. Reilly, Jr., 
			JD, LLM Founding Principal
John B. Stiles
				Principal
Timothy M. Malloy
				Vice President
Brett A. Mirliani, CFA, CFP®
				Vice President
Adam J. Desjardins, CFA
				Vice President


 



Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
	  24 Federal Street, 10th Floor | Boston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300 | Fax: 617-502-8310 | BirchHillAdvisors.comWebsite Design by Cold Spring Design | Photos by Erb Photography | Legal Notices









Verify real user


























Verify real user













Verify real user


























Verify real user













Verify real user


























Verify real user













Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC                                                                                       - Boston                                            , MA         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



MA



Boston



Investment Advice



Investment Advisory Service



                            Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
                                    



 





















B 


Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC                                                                                      
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



24 FEDERAL ST FL 10 BOSTON, MA 02110
Get Directions



(617) 502-8300
www.birchhilladvisors.com                                                                               





Business Info



 Founded 2007
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $619,242.00
 Employee Count 4
 Industries Investment Advisory Service
 Contacts Miner A Crary                                                                                                           







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc                                                                                       was founded in 2007. Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc                                                                                       specializes in Investment Advisory Service. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







B

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.


















Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc in Boston, MA 02110 - ChamberofCommerce.com




   =     


        









Sign Up
Sign In
Contact Us


 














Search
 

near
 













Home
» Massachusetts
» Boston
» Banking Services
» Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc













Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc


0 Reviews

0.0000 stars - based on 0 reviews
                            





24 Federal st Fl 10 Fl 10 Boston, Massachusetts 02110


(617) 502-8300
Website


 



 

Print |
                Save |
                Directions


About
Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc is located at the address 24 Federal st Fl 10 in Boston, Massachusetts 02110.  They can be contacted via phone at (617) 502-8300 for pricing, hours and directions.  Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc has an annual sales volume of 0 - 500K.  .For more information contact Christopher  Barrow, President or  go to www.birchhilladvisors.comBirch Hill Investment Advisors Llc provides Estate Planning, Long Term Planning, Family Wealth Planning to it's customers.  For maps and directions to Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc view the map to the right.  For reviews of Birch Hill Investment Advisors Llc see below.









Business Features

PRODUCTS


Mortgages
, IRAs
, Mortgage Investments
, Rollover Plans
, Annuities
, Mutual Funds
, Stocks
, Corporate Bonds
, Real Estate Mutual Funds
, Loans



SERVICES


College Funding
, Online Services
, Short Term Planning
, Family Wealth Planning
, Estate Planning
, Institutional Services
, Long Term Planning
, Banking



 


Information

CONTACT INFORMATION
Phone: (617) 502-8300
Website: www.birchhilladvisors.com
ADDITIONAL INFORMATION:
Employee Size: 1 To 4
Exact Employee Count: 1
Exact Sales Volume: 250000
Location Type: Single Location
Sales Volume: 0 - 500K
CATEGORIES:


Banking Services
Investment Banking & Securities Dealers & Brokers
Finance
Commercial Banking
Investments & Securities



People Also Viewed


American Express


125 High St 900A Ste Boston, Massachusetts 02110




State Street Corp


100 Huntington Ave  Boston, Massachusetts 02116




ADAMAS PARTNERS


Lewis Whf  Boston, Massachusetts 02108




Financial Sciences  Inc


21 Milk st Ste 2 Ste 2 Boston, Massachusetts 02109




PCM INC


146 Oliver St  Boston, Massachusetts 02110




BOSTON INVESTOR SERVICES INCORPORATED


125 Summer St 1470 Ste Boston, Massachusetts 02110





Reviews

Add


You must Sign in to post reviews.





by  on 






Click here to be the first to review this business...



0 Reviews
 


Key Contacts




Christopher  Barrow
PRESIDENT
Phone: (617) 502-8324 
 



 























 






Site Map
FAQ
Privacy Policy
Terms of Use
About
Partners
Chamber Partner Program
Chamber Member Benefits




Top Cities:
Atlanta
Bronx
Brooklyn
Chicago
Cleveland
Dallas
Denver
Detroit
Houston
Las Vegas
Los Angeles
Miami
Minneapolis
New York
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Saint Louis
San Antonio
San Diego
San Jose


© 2017 CHAMBEROFCOMMERCE.COM










 





Review of Birch Hill Investment Advisors – AdvisoryHQ



























































 












































		How to Earn an Extra $1K–$10K a Month on Amazon Learn More >> 







Advisory Firms (Reviews) 
Review of Birch Hill Investment Advisors
June 14, 2017by AdvisoryHQ










Review of Birch Hill Investment Advisors



Review of Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC



Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC was founded in June 2007 and is wholly owned by its principals, Miner Crary, Gary Mikula, Robert O’Neil, Thomas Reilly, and John Stiles.  


The firm is named after an area of New England owned by a long-time client and embodies the work ethics and values of that family and the clients the company serves.


The firm is an SEC Registered Investment Advisor (RIA) that acts as a fiduciary to its clients, providing them with independent, unbiased advice and investment services on a fee-only basis.


The company delivers investment advisory services to individuals, trusts, IRAs and other employee benefit plans, endowment and foundations accounts, and certain other non-taxable entities. 





Image Source: Birch Hill Investment Advisors Review


Advisors at the firm have extensive experience in a broad segment of financial disciplines, including investment research, portfolio management, taxation, and trust administration.


Due to their straightforward advice and successful track record, successive generations of families have retained the company to manage their wealth.


The company’s investment solutions are based on a strategy that primarily employs individual stocks and bonds to build client portfolios. However, portfolios for certain asset classes may also be constructed by using other investment vehicles such as mutual funds and exchange traded funds.


While the company does not have a stated minimum account balance policy for clients to seek advisory assistance, an implied $1 million in investable assets is required based on the firm’s standard minimum account fee of $10,000. The minimum fee requirement may, however, be waived or reduced at the discretion of the firm based on individual client circumstances.








Strategy and Approach


Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC is committed to a growth-oriented approach in managing client assets. They do this by putting together high-quality portfolios that are tailored to each client’s individual needs.


These portfolios are developed after intense consultations with clients to understand client investment goals, risk appetite, investment time horizons, and other financial objectives based on long-term perspectives.


The firm’s service delivery may not necessarily be restricted to portfolio construction and investment management. Clients may opt for non-discretionary consulting arrangements through which the firm’s advisors may provide review, supervision, and recommendations on the selection of third-party investment advisors that the client might be using.


The company seeks to provide its clients with services beyond their portfolios and offers to coordinate services with other professionals that a client might be working with, including attorneys and accountants, in areas such as income and estate tax planning, giving strategies, and outside accounts such as employee benefit plans and family trusts.


Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC uses a personalized approach to managing client portfolios. For instance, the portfolios of socially-responsible clients will take into consideration client-requested restrictions/limitations when building the portfolio. Similarly, where a client has other significant interests in a specific industry or business segment, such portfolios may be constructed with reduced/no exposure to such industries/businesses. 


Where appropriate, and depending on each client’s risk profile, other alternate investment vehicles may also be used when developing a portfolio. Such vehicles may include real estate partnerships, hedge funds, private equity, and venture capital.



Don't Miss: High Yield Bank Accounts

  


What We Like About Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC


1. Independent, unbiased advice


As a client, you are assured of always receiving independent, unbiased advice. That’s because their advice is not compromised by any interests other than yours.


2. Long-term investment view


When designing individual investment plans for clients, the firm’s advisors undertake a fundamental analysis in searching for high-quality investment vehicles. All of the investment solutions are tailored for the long haul, keeping in mind client investment timeframes and risk appetite.


3. Highly redundant client service model


Unlike most other firms in the business, Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC has a back-up plan built in for delivering client service. While you will be advised and counseled by a principal in the firm, there will always be a second principal that is up to speed on your situation and can advise you if needed.


4. Broad-based services


While the firm has extensive experience in a wide range of areas, including investment research, portfolio management, taxation, and trust administration, as a client, you may also opt to have the firm coordinate financial solutions with your attorneys, accountants, and other professionals that you might be working with.


5. Transparency


Clients work directly with principals in the firm. However, all assets are under the control of an independent custodian, which provides greater transparency with regards to account activity and the transactions that may occur in your portfolio.


6. Tailored portfolio construction


When it comes to portfolio construction, advisors at Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC do not use cookie cutter templates. Each portfolio is built keeping in mind individual client restrictions and preferences. Portfolios for clients subscribing to sustainable lifestyles or environmentally friendly ideologies for instance, will not contain vehicles that run contrary to their beliefs.








Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC Review – Team Members


The Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC team brings over 100 years of financial industry experience to the fore when serving clients with all of that experience backed by industry-recognized professional designations.


Two of the principals at the firm hold the Chartered Financial Analyst (CFA) designation, with one being an attorney with extensive experience in tax, trust, and estate administration matters.


Other designations, certifications, and accreditations that team members hold include CFP, JD, LLM, BS, BA, and MBA.



Miner A. Crary


Gary R. Mikula


Robert A. O'Neil, Jr.


Thomas E. Reilly, Jr.


John B. Stiles


Timothy M. Malloy


Adam J. Desjardins



…Click here for an overview of the Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC team








Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC Fees








Image Source: Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC Fees



►► How to Prevent CANCER (Everything You Need to Know)



Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC Reviews – Services


Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC provides investment advisory services to individuals, trusts, IRAs, and other employee benefit plans, endowments, and foundation accounts. 



Specific services offered by the company include:


Portfolio construction


Investment solutions


Third-party investment advisor selection


Coordination with other client advisors for services including:


Income tax


Estate tax


Giving strategies


Other financial matters


Research services (to associated entities)


Discretionary portfolio management for trustees of trusts



Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC Address Information (Local Office):



24 Federal Street, 10th Floor, Boston, MA 02110



To Contact Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC:



Tel – 617-502-8300


Email: info@birchhilladvisors.com









FREE software to help you make smarter financial decisions


See all your accounts in one place with this award-winning highly advanced, and free software for easy budgeting, money management, investments, expense tracking, and many more for all devices (online, desktop, iPhone, Mac, Samsung, Windows, tablets, etc.).


Click below (link will open in a new tab).


►► Top Rated Finance Software (FREE) ◄◄





This free tool lets you manage your entire financial life from one secure place – so you can reach your goals faster. Get yours now!



AdvisoryHQ Disclaimer:


Reasonable efforts have been made to present accurate information, however all info is presented without warranty. Review AdvisoryHQ’s Terms for details. Also review each firm’s site for the most updated data, rates and info.


Note: Firms and products, including the one(s) reviewed above, may be our affiliates. Click to view our advertiser disclosures.

 
Written by AdvisoryHQ


 




LATEST RELATED ARTICLES




 


Raymond James Reviews | What You Should Know About Raymond James Financial in 2017
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ Ranking Team 
 


 


Thrivent Financial Reviews | Online Financial Directory
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 
 


 


Review of Bartholomew & Company
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 
 


 


Fort Des Moines Financial Services Review | Des Moines, IA
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 
 


 


Santori & Peters Review
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 
 


 


Overview of Padden Financial Planning – Chicago, IA
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 
 


 


Long Financial Planning – History, Reviews and Overview
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 
 


 


Messier Financial Advisors Review – Premier Fee Based Financial Planner (Texas)
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 
 


 


Overview of Beacon Financial Advisors – Texas
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 
 


 


Review of Independence Advisors – Pennsylvania Wealth Manager
Advisory Firms (Reviews)
June 19, 2017by AdvisoryHQ 





 









 







x

 

x





Share This On:     





















﻿






























Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC Has $581,000 Position in Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP) - Chaffey Breeze













































 
















 



  
 
 
























Daily Ratings & News for Roper Technologies Inc.

        
	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor Roper Technologies Inc. with our free daily email newsletter:










Follow @chaffeybreeze












Recent Posts

Somewhat Favorable News Coverage Unlikely to Impact Liberty Global PLC (NASDAQ:LBTYA) Share Price
Pinnacle Foods (NYSE:PF) Getting Somewhat Negative Press Coverage, Report Shows
Molina Healthcare Inc (NYSE:MOH) Expected to Announce Quarterly Sales of $4.83 Billion
Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage Somewhat Likely to Impact MACOM Technology Solutions Holdings (NASDAQ:MTSI) Share Price
Aberdeen Asia-Pacific Income Fund (NYSE:FAX) Earns Daily Media Impact Score of 0.04
Seacoast Banking Corporation of Florida (NASDAQ:SBCF) Given Daily News Impact Score of -0.03
Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage Somewhat Unlikely to Affect SodaStream International (SODA) Share Price
NCI Building Systems (NCS) Receiving Somewhat Positive Media Coverage, Report Finds
Chesapeake Utilities Corporation (CPK) Receives Coverage Optimism Score of 0.19
Greenbrier Companies, Inc. (The) (GBX) Receives Daily News Sentiment Rating of 0.21
Adecoagro (AGRO) Earning Somewhat Favorable Media Coverage, Study Shows
Brokerages Set Tallgrass Energy GP, LP (NYSE:TEGP) Target Price at $28.63
Critical Survey: Romaco Resourcs (NASDAQ:METC) versus Warrior Met Coal (HCC)
Head to Head Survey: Quiksilver (ZQK) versus Carter’s (NYSE:CRI)
Head to Head Survey: Geopark (GPRK) versus Vanguard Natural Resources (NASDAQ:VNR)
American Campus Communities Inc (NYSE:ACC) Stock Rating Lowered by TheStreet
Orion Engineered Carbons S.A (NYSE:OEC) Stock Rating Upgraded by TheStreet
Torchmark Corporation (TMK) Releases FY17 Earnings Guidance
Regal Entertainment Group (NYSE:RGC) Posts  Earnings Results, Misses Estimates By $0.01 EPS
QEP Resources, Inc. (NYSE:QEP) Releases  Earnings Results, Beats Expectations By $0.08 EPS







Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC Has $581,000 Position in Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP)


					Posted by Lucas Kauffman on Jul 15th, 2017 // No Comments




Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC maintained its stake in  Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) during the first quarter, according to its most recent filing with the SEC. The fund owned 2,815 shares of the industrial products company’s stock at the end of the first quarter. Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC’s holdings in Roper Technologies were worth $581,000 as of its most recent SEC filing. 
Several other hedge funds have also recently added to or reduced their stakes in the company. Rothschild Asset Management Inc. purchased a new stake in  Roper Technologies during the first quarter valued at approximately $480,000.  Legal & General Group Plc boosted its stake in shares of  Roper Technologies by 7.1% in the first quarter. Legal & General Group Plc now owns 459,095 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $94,801,000 after buying an additional 30,417 shares during the period.  WINTON GROUP Ltd boosted its stake in shares of  Roper Technologies by 909.9% in the first quarter. WINTON GROUP Ltd now owns 138,941 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $25,353,000 after buying an additional 125,183 shares during the period.  Stephens Investment Management Group LLC boosted its stake in shares of  Roper Technologies by 3.6% in the first quarter. Stephens Investment Management Group LLC now owns 11,453 shares of the industrial products company’s stock valued at $2,365,000 after buying an additional 402 shares during the period.  Finally, Turner Investments LLC bought a new stake in shares of  Roper Technologies during the first quarter valued at approximately $960,000. Institutional investors own  96.73% of the company’s stock. 


 Get Roper Technologies Inc. alerts:



Shares of Roper Technologies, Inc. (NYSE:ROP) traded down 0.25% during midday trading on Friday, hitting $235.81. 461,377 shares of the stock were exchanged. The stock’s 50-day moving average price is $227.90 and its 200 day moving average price is $208.27. The stock has a market cap of $24.06 billion, a P/E ratio of 36.40 and a beta of 1.05. Roper Technologies, Inc. has a one year low of $159.28 and a one year high of $238.17. 





Roper Technologies (NYSE:ROP) last posted its quarterly earnings results on Friday, April 28th. The industrial products company reported $2.11 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the Thomson Reuters’ consensus estimate of $1.99 by $0.12. The firm had revenue of $1.09 billion for the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $1.09 billion. Roper Technologies had a return on equity of 12.81% and a net margin of 16.74%. The business’s quarterly revenue was up 20.4% on a year-over-year basis. During the same quarter in the previous year, the firm earned $1.81 EPS.  On average, analysts anticipate that  Roper Technologies, Inc. will post $9.21 earnings per share for the current year. 
The firm also recently announced a quarterly dividend, which will be paid on Friday, July 21st. Investors of record on Friday, July 7th will be issued a dividend of $0.35 per share. This represents a $1.40 dividend on an annualized basis and a dividend yield of 0.59%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend is Wednesday, July 5th. Roper Technologies’s payout ratio is presently 21.60%. 
ILLEGAL ACTIVITY NOTICE: “Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC Has $581,000 Position in Roper Technologies, Inc. (ROP)” was first  reported by Chaffey Breeze and is owned by of Chaffey Breeze. If you are accessing this piece of content on another publication, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of US & international copyright and trademark laws. The legal version of this piece of content can be viewed at https://www.chaffeybreeze.com/2017/07/15/roper-technologies-inc-rop-position-maintained-by-birch-hill-investment-advisors-llc-updated-updated-updated.html. 
Several analysts recently commented on the stock. Royal Bank Of Canada  reiterated a “buy” rating and issued a $248.00 price objective on shares of Roper Technologies in a research note on Wednesday. Stifel Nicolaus  reiterated a “buy” rating and issued a $242.00 price objective on shares of Roper Technologies in a research note on Friday, July 7th. Raymond James Financial, Inc. raised their price objective on shares of Roper Technologies from $253.00 to $268.00 in a research note on Wednesday, July 5th. Zacks Investment Research upgraded shares of Roper Technologies from a “hold” rating to a “buy” rating and set a $259.00 price objective for the company in a research note on Tuesday, July 4th. Finally, Barclays PLC raised their target price on shares of Roper Technologies from $221.00 to $237.00 and gave the company an “overweight” rating in a report on Monday, May 1st. Two investment analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating, nine have issued  a buy rating and one  has given a strong buy rating to the stock. Roper Technologies  has a consensus rating of “Buy” and a consensus target price of $232.09.
In related news, Director Christopher Wright sold 1,800 shares of the business’s stock in a transaction that occurred on Friday, June 9th. The stock was sold at an average price of $228.70, for a total transaction of $411,660.00. Following the transaction, the director now directly owns 66,104 shares of the company’s stock, valued at approximately $15,117,984.80. The transaction was disclosed in a legal filing with the Securities & Exchange Commission, which can be accessed through this hyperlink. 2.50% of the stock is currently owned by insiders. 
Roper Technologies Company Profile








Receive News & Ratings for Roper Technologies Inc. Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for Roper Technologies Inc. and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.








 






















Latest News





Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website












 

 





















































	The Adviser Center: Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC - InvestmentNews 
	














































































































Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC




Share:





24 Federal Street  10th Floor  Boston, MA 02110617-502-8300birchhilladvisors.com 

No. advisers: 16AUM: $1,403,947,004 













Asset BreakdownRecruitment & Staffing









Asset Breakdown


Asset BreakdownRecruitment & Staffing 













Staff


Employees
16


Clients


High-net-worth individuals
76-99%


Financial planning clients
N/A


High-net-worth client assets
More than 75%


Compensation


Percentage of assets under management
Yes


Hourly charges
Yes


Subscription fees
No


Fixed fees
Yes


Commissions
No


Performance-based fees
No










 



Total AUM
Total Accounts
Avg. Account AUM


Discretionary
$1,402,449,193
1,020
$1,374,950


Non-discretionary
1497811
1
$1,497,811


Total
$1,403,947,004
1,021
$1,375,071












Notes
N/A = Not available
N/D = Not disclosed
— = Information not available or not disclosed



Purchase the data and information contained in the RIA Data Center in an Excel spreadsheet.For comments or suggestions about the Adviser Center, please contact us.Reprints: For reprints of these rankings, please contact Laura Picariello.*Methodology: InvestmentNews qualified
1,906 firms headquartered in the United States based on data reported on Form ADV to the Securities and Exchange Commission as of May 1, 2017. To qualify, firms must have met the following criteria: (1) latest ADV filing date is either on or after January
1, 2017, (2) total AUM is at least $100M, (3) does not have employees who are registered representatives of a broker-dealer, (4) provided investment advisory services to clients during its most recently completed fiscal year, (5) no more than 50% of amount
of regulatory assets under management is attributable to pooled investment vehicles (other than investment companies), (6) no more than 25% of amount of regulatory assets under management is attributable to pension and profit-sharing plans (but not the plan
participants), (7) no more than 25% of amount of regulatory assets under management is attributable to corporations or other businesses, (8) does not receive commissions, (9) provides financial planning services, (10) is not actively engaged in business as
a broker-dealer (registered or unregistered), (11) is not actively engaged in business as a registered representative of a broker-dealer, (12) has neither a related person who is a broker-dealer/municipal securities dealer/government securities broker or dealer
(registered or unregistered) nor one who is an insurance company or agency. 

















Featured video

		Events
Cybersecurity threats advisers are seeing right now The key threats advisers are seeing right now seem to change daily.  Michelle Thetford of Schwab Advisor Services explains how to protect yourself and your clients.Video SpotlightWill It Last As Long As Your Clients Do?Sponsored by Prudential	INTV
Schwab's Jon Beatty: How independent firms are winning high-net-worth clients




Channels

INTV
Events
Practice Makeover
Smarter in 60 Seconds
Secrets Behind Success
Gadget Girl
The Secret Life of...
Consuelo Mack Wealthtrack









Latest news & opinion




Jay Clayton says SEC, DOL can give market 'clarity' on fiduciary rule
Chief regulator is confident two agencies could reach 'common ground' on an investment advice standard across all accounts. 






Vanguard winning at bond inflows, too
But iShares is strong competition.






Sen. Gary Peters brings broker background to work every day on Capitol Hill
Michigan Democrat resists ripping up DOL fiduciary rule but would be open to some changes.






DOL fiduciary rule causing DC-plan record keepers to change business with insurance agents
Principal has communicated that independent agents must change their business models to keep receiving compensation.






DOL fiduciary rule opponents want to push implementation back until 2019
ICI, Chamber of Commerce among groups asking for delay, while Democratic lawmakers call on DOL to keep to its earlier planned schedule of Jan. 1, 2018.





 
 


















Subscribe to Print
Newsletter Sign-up
Register





Now in print


This week's issue
To download the full contents of this week's issue, click here.
Past Issues
July 8, 2017
June 24, 2017
June 17, 2017


Subscribe to Print



Get daily news & intel

The pulse of the financial advisory industry.








Breaking news and in-depth coverage of essential topics delivered straight to your inbox.
view all newsletters





Connect with us

Register to access our archive of leading investment information and data









Follow @newsfromIN
Follow @eventsfromIN
Follow @statsfromIN


Follow InvestmentNews
Financial Adviser Group
Retirement Income Summit Group
Alternative Investments Conference
40 Under 40


Like us on Facebook
Like our fan page to receive the latest news and opinion from InvestmentNews.



Latest News & Opinion
Subscribe to this RSS feed to receive the latest news and opinion from InvestmentNews.









































Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC | Wealthminder











































Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC


Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
(CRD# 143750) is a financial advisory firm headquartered in
Boston, MA.
They
manage $1,310,644,626 in 976 accounts and
serve the financial needs of clients across 33 states (or territories).




Current Firm Details



Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC




24 Federal Street 10th Floor,
Boston,
MA
02110
617-502-8300
http://www.birchhilladvisors.com




http://www.birchhilladvisors.com







By the Numbers






Total Assets Under Management

1,311
MILLION



Total Number of Accounts

976
ACCOUNTS



Average Account Value

$1,342,874







Compensation Options




A percentage of assets under your management
Hourly charges
Fixed fees (other than subscription fees)






Advisory Services Offered




Portfolio management for individuals and/or small businesses
Portfolio management for businesses (other than small businesses) or institutional clients
Selection of other advisers (including private fund managers)








Types of Clients










Registered States






Registered Investment Advisor


Advisors affiliated with a RIA are permitted to work with up to five clients in nearly-all states* without explicit registration. The map below shows states where this firm has explicit registration only.




AK, AZ, CA, CO, CT, DC, DE, FL, GA, HI, IL, IN, KS, MA, MD, ME, MI, MT, NH, NJ, NM, NV, NY, OH, OR, PA, RI, SC, TN, TX, VA, VT, WA






Financial Advisors at Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC




Showing 1 - 6 of 6 top financial advisors.





1















Gary R. Mikula



CRD#:
1582849



24 Federal Street 10th Floor,
Boston,
MA
02110




96

Wealthminder
score








Gary Mikula (CRD# 1582849) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC in Boston, MA and has 
over 30 years
of experience in the finance industry.






2















Brett A. Mirliani



CRD#:
2494018



24 Federal Street 10th Floor,
Boston,
MA
02110




96

Wealthminder
score








Brett Mirliani (CRD# 2494018) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC in Boston, MA and has 
over 23 years
of experience in the finance industry.
Brett Mirliani has taken additional exams to become a Certified Financial Planner (CFP®). CFP professionals must pass the comprehensive CFP Certification Examination,
pass CFP Board's Fitness Standards for Candidates and Registrants, agree to abide by CFP Board's Code of Ethics and Professional Responsibility and Rules of Conduct which put
clients' interests first and comply with the Financial Planning Practice Standards.






3















Thomas E. Reilly



CRD#:
3091437



24 Federal Street 10th Floor,
Boston,
MA
02110




93

Wealthminder
score








Thomas Reilly (CRD# 3091437) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC in Boston, MA and has 
over 19 years
of experience in the finance industry.






4















Miner A. Crary



CRD#:
4340422



24 Federal Street 10th Floor,
Boston,
MA
02110




90

Wealthminder
score








Miner Crary (CRD# 4340422) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC in Boston, MA and has 
1 year
of experience in the finance industry.






5















Robert A. Oneil



CRD#:
1626421



24 Federal Street 10th Floor,
Boston,
MA
02110




90

Wealthminder
score








Robert Oneil (CRD# 1626421) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC in Boston, MA and has 
1 year
of experience in the finance industry.






6















Timothy M. Malloy



CRD#:
4897935



24 Federal Street 10th Floor,
Boston,
MA
02110




89

Wealthminder
score








Timothy Malloy (CRD# 4897935) is an Investment Advisor Representative working at
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC in Boston, MA and has 
over 3 years
of experience in the finance industry.













Our primary data source is public filings of Form ADV as published by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) and made available in accordance with the Freedom of Information Act (FOIA). Supplementary information may be provided by listed advisors or their representatives.
Because many firms provide a variety of products or services, an individual may or may not be registered to operate under all services provided by the firm.Do not rely solely on the information on this page. The information may be inaccurate, incomplete or outdated. For the most accurate and up-to-date information, please search for the firm or individual on the SEC site at
http://www.adviserinfo.sec.gov/IAPD/Content/Search/iapd_Search.aspx







Ready to hire a financial advisor?

Get competitive proposals from multiple advisors.

















Request Proposals























Timeout!



You have been idle and will be logged out in

seconds.


Stay Logged In
Log Out Now

















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Birch Hill Investment Advisors - Web - WebCrawler











































 













 




Web 
|

Images 
|

Videos 
|

News 










 










1

2


3


4


5


6


7


8


9


Next >





Ads





Find Investment Advisors
local-financial-advisor.co.uk/
Free Online Service to Find a Local Investment Advisor in Your Area!




Investment Advisor
www.EdwardJones.com
Find A Financial Advisor & See Why Edward Jones® Is Right For You.





Schedule a Review


What Makes Us Different


Investments & Services




Financial Advisor Locator


Account Options


Our Approach








Hill Investment Advisors
Simpli.com/Hill Investment Advisors
Birch Hill Investment Advisors. Want Quick Answers? Search Simpli!




Investment Advisor - Find Top Results
shopdealio.net/Investment/Advisors
Look For Personal Investment Advisors. See It & Explore More!

 

Web Results





Web Results

 


                Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC | Wealth Management Advice
            

                www.birchhilladvisors.com
                
            

                Birch Hill Investment Advisors manages investments and provides wealth management advice for individuals, families, trusts and institutions.
            



 


                Our Team - Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC
            

                www.birchhilladvisors.com/our-team.html
                
            

                With over 100 years of combined experience, Birch Hill's Founding Principals continue to be personally engaged in management of clients' financial assets.
            



 


                Birch Hill Investment Advisors - Investment Advisor ...
            

                investment-advisors.credio.com/…stment-Advisors-LLC
                
            

                Find details on Birch Hill Investment Advisors in Boston, Massachusetts. View assets, client details, advisory activities, registration status, disclosures and more.
            



 


                Review of Birch Hill Investment Advisors – AdvisoryHQ
            

                www.advisoryhq.com/…-birch-hill-investment-advisors
                
            

                What We Like About Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC. 1. Independent, unbiased advice. As a client, you are assured of always receiving independent, unbiased advice.
            



 


                birch hill investment advisors | Investing in 24 Federal ...
            

                reviews.birdeye.com/…ch-hill-investment-advisors...
                
            

                Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC is located at 24 Federal St Fl 10, Boston, MA. This location is in the Downtown neighborhood. This business specializes in ...
            




Investment Advisor
Ad · www.EdwardJones.com
Find A Financial Advisor & See Why Edward Jones® Is Right For You.





Schedule a Review


What Makes Us Different


Investments & Services




Financial Advisor Locator


Account Options


Our Approach








Hill Investment Advisors
Ad · Simpli.com/Hill Investment Advisors
Birch Hill Investment Advisors. Want Quick Answers? Search Simpli!




Investment Advisor - Find Top Results
Ad · shopdealio.net/Investment/Advisors
Look For Personal Investment Advisors. See It & Explore More!



 


                The Adviser Center: Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC ...
            

                careers.investmentnews.com/…ser-center/profile/2331
                
            

                B-D Data Center. Find out which firms offer the highest payouts, have the most reps in the field and generate the most revenue - or create your own custom rankings.
            



 


                Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC | LinkedIn
            

                www.linkedin.com/…irch-hill-investment-advisors-llc
                
            

                Learn about working at Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC. Join LinkedIn today for free. See who you know at Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC, leverage your ...
            



 


                Birch Hill Investment Advisors Company Profile | Owler
            

                www.owler.com/…88/birch-hill-investment-advisors...
                
            

                Birch Hill Investment Advisors is located in 24 Federal St Fl 10, Boston, Massachusetts, USA 02110-2516. Check out Birch Hill Investment Advisors' profile for ...
            



 


                Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC - BrightScope
            

                www.brightscope.com/…h-Hill-Investment-Advisors-LLC
                
            

                Contact Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC or view Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC's ratings, investment advice, financial planning and insurance services, and get ...
            



 


                Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC Sells 725 Shares of ...
            

                weekherald.com/…6/birch-hill-investment-advisors...
                
            

                Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC reduced its position in Dominion Energy Inc. (NYSE:D) by 3.4% during the first quarter, according to its most recent ...
            






Ads



Find Investment Advisors
local-financial-advisor.co.uk/
Free Online Service to Find a Local Investment Advisor in Your Area!




Investment Advisor
www.EdwardJones.com
Find A Financial Advisor & See Why Edward Jones® Is Right For You.





Schedule a Review


What Makes Us Different


Investments & Services




Financial Advisor Locator


Account Options


Our Approach








Hill Investment Advisors
Simpli.com/Hill Investment Advisors
Birch Hill Investment Advisors. Want Quick Answers? Search Simpli!

 


Are you looking for?

birch hill equity partners 


black birch advisors 


birch hill capital 


adviser investments boston 


birch hill happenings 


birch hill capital partners 


birch hill equity 


birch hill 






1

2


3


4


5


6


7


8


9


Next >








Are you looking for?

birch hill equity partners 


black birch advisors 


birch hill capital 


adviser investments boston 


birch hill happenings 


birch hill capital partners 


birch hill equity 


birch hill 





Birch Hill Investment Advisors Articles


Interesting Reading #633 - Jaguar C-X75 review, Free land, Mystery spacecraft,…


blogs.howstuffworks.com/…nteresting-reading-633.htm

Interesting Reading #633 - Jaguar C-X75 review, Free land, Mystery spacecraft, "Fingerprinting" PCs and much more!



How the U.S. President Works


people.howstuffworks.com/president.htm

When the framers of the Constitution considered an executive branch, they were still stinging from the despotic rule of King George III. Ultimately, the framers saw the need for a single…



China


geography.howstuffworks.com/…geography-of-china.htm

China, or the People's Republic of China, a country in eastern Asia. It is sometimes called Communist China or Mainland China to distinguish it from the Republic of China, or Nationalist…



Birch Hill Investment Advisors News Continued


•

Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC Cuts Stake in Gentex Corporation (GNTX)
It marked his second offense in a month, after he was previously cited for arguing with a coworker a few weeks earlier. As for the attempted kidnapping, Portland police told the news station…
wobko.net,
7/7/2017



•

Westwood Holdings Group Inc. Acquires 21,360 Shares of Amphenol Corporation…
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC bought a new position in shares of Amphenol Corporation during the first quarter valued at $105,000. National Pension Service raised its position in shares…
themarketsdaily.com,
7/25/2017



•

Fifteen advisers, six firms named finalists by charitable foundation
Keller of First Security Investments, Advisor Group – SagePoint Financial, Sarasota, Florida, for her work with the Boys & Girls Clubs of Sarasota County; and Thomas E. Reilly, Jr. of Birch…
Investment News,
7/20/2017



•

Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC Sells 400 Shares of IDEXX Laboratories, Inc.…
Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC cut its stake in IDEXX Laboratories, Inc. (NASDAQ:IDXX) by 14.5% during the first quarter, according to its most recent disclosure with the Securities and…
BNS,
6/13/2017




More Related News >



Birch Hill Investment Advisors Videos








CVCA Birch Hill Financial
This is "CVCA Birch Hill Financial" by Studio 141 on Vimeo, the home for high quality videos and the people who love them.









The Fed Is Being Consistent: Hill
Jan. 29 (Bloomberg) –- Affinity Investment Advisors’ Jeremy Hill and Bloomberg’s Mark Crumpton discuss the markets reaction to the fed taper decision in “On ...









Market Turmoil: Correction or Selloff?
Jan. 24 (Bloomberg) –- Affinity Investment Advisors's \nJeremy Hill and Bloomberg's Alix Steel discuss the markets\nclosing down for the second day in a row and ...




More Related Videos >



 













© 2017 InfoSpace Holdings LLC
About
.
Privacy
.
Terms
.
Contact Us




















 





















Find a Financial Advisor | Edward Jones

























Edward Jones
Hide Menu
Open Search


Enter search terms

Close Search
Search Site







Edward JonesHide Menu



Secure Login


Find an Advisor
The Value of Edward Jones
Investments & Services
Preparing for Your Future
Market News & Guidance


Set Country

US | En
Set Country

US | En
CA | En
CA | Fr











By Location
By Name




Find a Financial Advisor
Enter a city and state, or zip code


Submit

Get my current location


Anyone can provide advice. Our goal is to provide advice and guidance based on your needs. We have more than 14,000 financial advisors in the U.S. – each one dedicated to doing what’s right for our clients. 
To find a financial advisor near you, use the search box above.





Find a Financial Advisor

Select a State


State
AK
AL
AR
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DC
DE
FL
GA
HI
IA
ID
IL
IN
KS
KY
LA
MA
MD
ME
MI
MN
MO
MS
MT
NC
ND
NE
NH
NJ
NM
NV
NY
OH
OK
OR
PA
RI
SC
SD
TN
TX
UT
VA
VT
WA
WI
WV
WY


Enter a last name

Submit



Anyone can provide advice. Our goal is to provide advice and guidance based on your needs. We have more than 13,000 financial advisors in the U.S. – each one dedicated to doing what’s right for our clients. 
To find a financial advisor near you, use the search box above.






Find a Financial Advisor




Start a New Search



Show More




First Name (Required)



Last Name (Required)



Email (Required)



Are you a client? (Required)


							Yes I am a client

							No I am not a client



Type your message
500 characters remaining

This form is subject to our Online Privacy Statement.

Send
Cancel


Thank you. Your message has been submitted.Close


There was an error submitting your message. Please refresh your browser and try again.Close






New Search

By Location


Submit





By Name

Select a State


State
AK
AL
AR
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DC
DE
FL
GA
HI
IA
ID
IL
IN
KS
KY
LA
MA
MD
ME
MI
MN
MO
MS
MT
NC
ND
NE
NH
NJ
NM
NV
NY
OH
OK
OR
PA
RI
SC
SD
TN
TX
UT
VA
VT
WA
WI
WV
WY


Enter a last name

Submit







































  
Home » Find a Financial Advisor


 





















The Value Of Edward Jones | Edward Jones

























Edward Jones
Hide Menu
Open Search


Enter search terms

Close Search
Search Site







Edward JonesHide Menu



Secure Login


Find an Advisor
The Value of Edward Jones
Investments & Services
Preparing for Your Future
Market News & Guidance


Set Country

US | En
Set Country

US | En
CA | En
CA | Fr















The Value of Edward Jones






The Edward Jones Advantage
Watch our video
Video Icon




The Edward Jones Advantage


                Use the following Play/Pause button to start and stop the video player.  When finished continue to the next region.
                Play/Pause





There's an advantage in working with a financial advisor who knows you – and your financial goals. That's what makes Edward Jones different from other investment firms. Supporting the relationship between you and your financial advisor shapes nearly every aspect of our business.
You may have seen one of our 12,000 offices in your community. That's because we believe you deserve more than a 1-800 number when it comes to your financial future.
What you may not know is that we're a Fortune 500 company with thousands of associates and sophisticated technology supporting your local financial advisor.
The Edward Jones approach in determining your goals, and developing tailored financial strategies, has been helping nearly 7 million clients for more than 90 years.
In fact, we like to think we became one of the largest financial services firms in the country by not acting that way. If you're ready to work with a different kind of investment firm—one that cares as much about why you're investing as what you invest in— you're ready to work with Edward Jones.
Close






Working with a Personal Financial Advisor
Watch our video
Video Icon







                Use the following Play/Pause button to start and stop the video player.  When finished continue to the next region.
                Play/Pause





Working with a Personal Financial Advisor
Whether you're new to investing or have been investing for years, you owe it to yourself to experience the difference of working with an Edward Jones financial advisor. Our firm is built to deliver personalized service, and we treat you with the respect you deserve. We've been doing it since 1922.
How we can help
We get it. Investing can be complicated. Ask all the questions you want, and we will answer them in plain English. Your financial advisor is your long-term financial partner. These are important goals and you need an advocate – someone who listens and really understands what's important to you. We believe that's the best way to develop a personalized financial strategy.
Close






Are We Right for You?
Here are 5 qualities you can expect from an Edward Jones financial advisor.
View slideshow
Read more 

Are We Right for You?






Understands Me
I want to work with a financial advisor who really gets to know me and my family, our goals and what’s important to us.







Clearly Explains Investing
I’m looking for a financial advisor who will spend time educating me on investment topics and answering my questions.







Knows My Investment Style
I want someone who makes recommendations in my best interest and explains how they can help me make progress towards my goals.







Meets on My Schedule
Meeting with my financial advisor should be convenient. And I want choices – whether that means meeting in person or over the phone.







Stays in Touch
I want my financial advisor to contact me to reassure me that I’m on the right track or make suggestions if I’m not. Even if I’m not expecting it.







Edward Jones & You
If these sound like qualities you’re looking for in a financial advisor, Edward Jones might be right for you.
Find a financial advisor






Understands Me
I want to work with a financial advisor who really gets to know me and my family, our goals and what’s important to us.


Clearly Explains Investing
I’m looking for a financial advisor who will spend time educating me on investment topics and answering my questions.


Knows My Investment Style
I want someone who makes recommendations in my best interest and explains how they can help me make progress towards my goals.


Meets on My Schedule
Meeting with my financial advisor should be convenient. And I want choices – whether that means meeting in person or over the phone.


Stays in Touch
I want my financial advisor to contact me to reassure me that I’m on the right track or make suggestions if I’m not. Even if I’m not expecting it.


Edward Jones & You
If these sound like qualities you’re looking for in a financial advisor, Edward Jones might be right for you.

Find a financial advisor



Close






Focus On You
Read more



Focus On You




Every investment firm has principles. And they usually sound exactly the same. We believe Edward Jones is different in almost every way. Our principles were deliberately created with you in mind. We don't just talk about personal service. We're built to deliver it.
Your dedicated financial advisor – It's your financial future, so an 800-number or Internet search for financial advice doesn't cut it. You have a relationship with an Edward Jones financial advisor, who spends time to learn why you're investing and then develops a personalized strategy. No cookie-cutter plans here.
In your neighborhood – With more than 15,000 financial advisors, you shouldn't have to go far to find an Edward Jones office in your community. That means you can actually meet with a financial advisor to discuss what's important to you.
Tailored for individual investors - All of our resources – including investment research, online account access, easy-to-understand statements, sophisticated software and detailed reports – are developed with you in mind.
Experienced support team - Backing up this personal service is a Fortune 500 company with thousands of people and advanced technology. Your financial advisor uses these resources to develop the best strategy for you.
We spend the time and have the knowledge to help you sort through complicated financial questions. Most financial services firms claim to focus on you and your needs, but can they really do it? We believe Edward Jones is uniquely positioned from the ground up to provide the attention, respect and service you deserve.
Find a financial advisor
Close






Prepare for Your First Appointment 
Learn more



Prepare for Your First Appointment 




We're honored that you're considering working with us to help achieve your financial goals. Here are three ways you can prepare our first meeting.


Think about why you're investing
Understanding the "why" will help you be better prepared to discuss your goals and strategies to help reach them. What's important to you and your family? What do you want to achieve?


Gather your statements
If you've worked with a financial advisor before, it's helpful to know about your current investments and your experience to date. If you're new to the investing world, we promise to talk with you, not at you. Our goal is to empower you with the knowledge you'll need to pursue your goals.


Bring your questions
We want to make sure to answer any investment questions you may have, as well as how we can best work together. What do you expect? How often do you want to touch base?


Request appointment
Close






Invested in the Community
We support the communities where we live and work. See how Edward Jones gets involved.
View slideshow
Learn more 

Invested in the Community






We are invested in our community
We value the communities where we work, so we're committed to giving back. You'll find our associates serving clients in our offices, but you'll also find us investing our time and talents to support local organizations and great causes. Many Financial Advisors are on Chambers of Commerce and serve as board members and event coordinators for local organizations, and our associates volunteer, donate and support a variety of charitable organizations.







Tour De Ted
Each year, branch and Home Office associates take to the road to raise funds for cancer research for the firm's annual Tour de Ted. In memory of Ted Jones, former managing partner who died from cancer, the first Tour de Ted showcased the firm's community-oriented culture while paying tribute to the history of Edward Jones. Volunteers rode the path of the original "wire" that connected Pueblo, Colo., to St. Louis, Mo., which created our branch network.







Emergency Assistance
Sixteen Financial Advisors in Texas decided to set aside one day out of their busy schedules to give back to their community. They volunteered at the Montgomery County Emergency Assistance facility by painting offices and hallways, and sorting and tagging clothes.







School Supply Drive
Eight local Edward Jones Financial Advisors teamed up on behalf of school children, clearly demonstrating their commitment to family values. Their school supply drive brought in hundreds of classroom necessities, from notebooks and markers to tissues and cleaning wipes.







Habitat for Humanity
When investors wanted to save for a new home, Edward Jones was there to help. Associates from Ontario, Canada, helped a local family reach its goal of home ownership in another way when they came together for the Habitat for Humanity build in Amherstburg, Ont., the first such home built in this community.







Pedal the Cause
We're proud of our associates who joined the fight against cancer as Edward Jones Pedal the Cause riders. More than 200 bike riders from across the U.S. took to the streets (and the Katy Trail) to help fundraise for cancer research.







Walk to End Alzheimer's®
At Edward Jones, we live and work in the communities we serve. We want to make a difference in people’s lives, both in and out of the office. Alzheimer’s disease has a significant impact on individuals, family, friends and community. That’s why we’ve chosen to partner with the Alzheimer’s Association as the National Presenting Sponsor of the Walk to End Alzheimer’s®. We invite you to join us in the fight to end this terrible disease.





We are invested in our community
We value the communities where we work, so we're committed to giving back. You'll find our associates serving clients in our offices, but you'll also find us investing our time and talents to support local organizations and great causes. Many Financial Advisors are on Chambers of Commerce and serve as board members and event coordinators for local organizations, and our associates volunteer, donate and support a variety of charitable organizations.

Tour De Ted
Each year, branch and Home Office associates take to the road to raise funds for cancer research for the firm's annual Tour de Ted. In memory of Ted Jones, former managing partner who died from cancer, the first Tour de Ted showcased the firm's community-oriented culture while paying tribute to the history of Edward Jones. Volunteers rode the path of the original "wire" that connected Pueblo, Colo., to St. Louis, Mo., which created our branch network.


Emergency Assistance
Sixteen Financial Advisors in Texas decided to set aside one day out of their busy schedules to give back to their community. They volunteered at the Montgomery County Emergency Assistance facility by painting offices and hallways, and sorting and tagging clothes.


School Supply Drive
Eight local Edward Jones Financial Advisors teamed up on behalf of school children, clearly demonstrating their commitment to family values. Their school supply drive brought in hundreds of classroom necessities, from notebooks and markers to tissues and cleaning wipes.


Habitat for Humanity
When investors wanted to save for a new home, Edward Jones was there to help. Associates from Ontario, Canada, helped a local family reach its goal of home ownership in another way when they came together for the Habitat for Humanity build in Amherstburg, Ont., the first such home built in this community.

Pedal the Cause
We're proud of our associates who joined the fight against cancer as Edward Jones Pedal the Cause riders. More than 200 bike riders from across the U.S. took to the streets (and the Katy Trail) to help fundraise for cancer research.

Walk to End Alzheimer's®
At Edward Jones, we live and work in the communities we serve. We want to make a difference in people’s lives, both in and out of the office. Alzheimer’s disease has a significant impact on individuals, family, friends and community. That’s why we’ve chosen to partner with the Alzheimer’s Association as the National Presenting Sponsor of the Walk to End Alzheimer’s®. We invite you to join us in the fight to end this terrible disease.



Close



























 





















Client Resources | Edward Jones

























Edward Jones
Hide Menu
Open Search


Enter search terms

Close Search
Search Site







Edward JonesHide Menu



Secure Login


Find an Advisor
The Value of Edward Jones
Investments & Services
Preparing for Your Future
Market News & Guidance


Set Country

US | En
Set Country

US | En
CA | En
CA | Fr














				
					
						Client Resources
					
				
				









				
					
						Anyone can provide advice. Our goal is to provide advice and guidance based on your needs. Here you’ll find information to help you get the most out of your relationship with your Edward Jones financial advisor and our firm.
					
									
				


Doing Business With Us
From understanding your statement to important agreements, this section provides information about working with Edward Jones.
	
		
		Learn more



Fraud Awareness & Prevention
Fraud is everywhere these days. How can you help protect yourself?
	
		
		Learn more



Tax Resources
Taxes aren’t just for tax season. These resources can help you year-round.
	
		
		Learn more



Convenient Account Features
From online bill pay to electronic funds transfer, we have the tools to make managing your expenses easy.
	
		
		Learn more












Your Financial Advisor





,  
Contact me


Not my financial advisor
Set as my financial advisor







By Location
By Name



Find a Financial Advisor
Enter a city and state, or zip code


Submit




Find a Financial Advisor
Select a State and then enter a last name

Select a State


State
AK
AL
AR
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DC
DE
FL
GA
HI
IA
ID
IL
IN
KS
KY
LA
MA
MD
ME
MI
MN
MO
MS
MT
NC
ND
NE
NH
NJ
NM
NV
NY
OH
OK
OR
PA
RI
SC
SD
TN
TX
UT
VA
VT
WA
WI
WV
WY


Enter a last name

Submit
















Digital Options to Stay in Touch Wherever You Go

Online Access is a great way to stay current with your account. We also offer a host of other digital services designed to get the most out of your relationship with us.
Learn more


Which account is right for you?
We offer many options that let you choose how to work with us.
Learn more
























 





















Find a Financial Advisor | Edward Jones

























Edward Jones
Hide Menu
Open Search


Enter search terms

Close Search
Search Site







Edward JonesHide Menu



Secure Login


Find an Advisor
The Value of Edward Jones
Investments & Services
Preparing for Your Future
Market News & Guidance


Set Country

US | En
Set Country

US | En
CA | En
CA | Fr











By Location
By Name




Find a Financial Advisor
Enter a city and state, or zip code


Submit

Get my current location


Anyone can provide advice. Our goal is to provide advice and guidance based on your needs. We have more than 14,000 financial advisors in the U.S. – each one dedicated to doing what’s right for our clients. 
To find a financial advisor near you, use the search box above.





Find a Financial Advisor

Select a State


State
AK
AL
AR
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DC
DE
FL
GA
HI
IA
ID
IL
IN
KS
KY
LA
MA
MD
ME
MI
MN
MO
MS
MT
NC
ND
NE
NH
NJ
NM
NV
NY
OH
OK
OR
PA
RI
SC
SD
TN
TX
UT
VA
VT
WA
WI
WV
WY


Enter a last name

Submit



Anyone can provide advice. Our goal is to provide advice and guidance based on your needs. We have more than 13,000 financial advisors in the U.S. – each one dedicated to doing what’s right for our clients. 
To find a financial advisor near you, use the search box above.






Find a Financial Advisor




Start a New Search



Show More




First Name (Required)



Last Name (Required)



Email (Required)



Are you a client? (Required)


							Yes I am a client

							No I am not a client



Type your message
500 characters remaining

This form is subject to our Online Privacy Statement.

Send
Cancel


Thank you. Your message has been submitted.Close


There was an error submitting your message. Please refresh your browser and try again.Close






New Search

By Location


Submit





By Name

Select a State


State
AK
AL
AR
AZ
CA
CO
CT
DC
DE
FL
GA
HI
IA
ID
IL
IN
KS
KY
LA
MA
MD
ME
MI
MN
MO
MS
MT
NC
ND
NE
NH
NJ
NM
NV
NY
OH
OK
OR
PA
RI
SC
SD
TN
TX
UT
VA
VT
WA
WI
WV
WY


Enter a last name

Submit







































  
Home » Find a Financial Advisor







birch hill investment - Money A2Z - Web Results










AOL Search
Skip over navigation


















Search the Web



























Web





Images


Images










Search Multiple Engines - Birch Hill Investment Advisors



Ad
 ·
www.webcrawler.com/​Search/​birch hill investment advisors



Get the most relevant results for birch hill investment advisors




New Stock Picking Method | MoneyMorning.Com



Ad
 ·
MoneyMorning.Com/​Best-Investments



New investing strategy unlocks "100% winners" all the time...




Current High Yield CDs | Bankrate.com



Ad
 ·
Bankrate.com/​HighYieldCDs



Compare FDIC Insured Banks Live 2017 National High Yield CD Rates.





Free Credit Score



Since 1976



Advice



Free Credit Report



Best CD Rates





Hill Investment Advisors - Birch Hill Investment Advisors.



Ad
 ·
Simpli.com/​Hill Investment Advisors



Birch Hill Investment Advisors. Want Quick Answers? Search Simpli!




Searches related tobirch hill investment



birch hill investments inc


birch hill capital


birch hill equity partners


birch hill happenings



birch hill capital partners


birch hill partners


birch equity partners


birch hill farm woodstock vt




Web Results

Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC | Wealth Management Advice

www.birchhilladvisors.com


Birch Hill Investment Advisors manages investments and provides wealth management advice for individuals, families, trusts and institutions.



Independently Owned



Contact



Client Service



Commentaries



Legal Notices



Our Team - Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC

www.birchhilladvisors.com/our-team.html


With over 100 years of combined experience, Birch Hill's Founding Principals continue to be personally engaged in management of clients' financial assets.


Birch Hill Equity Partners

https://www.birchhillequity.com


Cozzini Bros. Announces Recapitalization with Birch Hill Equity Partners • Birch Hill Equity Partners is ... an investment ally to ... the Birch Hill recipe ...


Birch Hill Equity Partners

https://www.birchhillequity.com/about_birch_hill/company_overview/...


Why Birch Hill; Investment Philosophy; The Birch Hill Experience; Finding the Right Fit; Organizations We Support; ... Birch Hill Equity Partners V, LP at the end of ...


Birch Hill Investment Advisors - Investment Advisor ...

investment-advisors.credio.com/.../Birch-Hill-Investment-Advisors-LLC


Find details on Birch Hill Investment Advisors in Boston, Massachusetts. View assets, client details, advisory activities, registration status, disclosures and more.


Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC | LinkedIn

https://www.linkedin.com/company/birch-hill-investment-advisors-llc


Learn about working at Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC. Join LinkedIn today for free. See who you know at Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC, leverage your ...


Birch Hill Investment Advisors Company Profile | Owler

https://www.owler.com/iaApp/1683088/birch-hill-investment-advisors...


Birch Hill Investment Advisors is located in 24 Federal St Fl 10, Boston, Massachusetts, USA 02110-2516. Check out Birch Hill Investment Advisors' profile for ...


Birch Hill Equity Partners

https://www.birchhillequity.com/investment_activity/current...


INVESTMENT ACTIVITY > CURRENT PARTNERS. Current investing partners Bio Agri Mix. Bio Agri Mix LP is the largest supplier of medicated feed additives for the animal ...


birch hill investment advisors | Investing in 24 Federal ...

https://reviews.birdeye.com/birch-hill-investment-advisors...


Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC is located at 24 Federal St Fl 10, Boston, MA. This location is in the Downtown neighborhood. This business specializes in ...










Search Multiple Engines - Birch Hill Investment Advisors



Ad
 ·
www.webcrawler.com/​Search/​birch hill investment advisors



Get the most relevant results for birch hill investment advisors




New Stock Picking Method | MoneyMorning.Com



Ad
 ·
MoneyMorning.Com/​Best-Investments



New investing strategy unlocks "100% winners" all the time...




Current High Yield CDs | Bankrate.com



Ad
 ·
Bankrate.com/​HighYieldCDs



Compare FDIC Insured Banks Live 2017 National High Yield CD Rates.





Free Credit Score



Since 1976



Advice



Free Credit Report



Best CD Rates





Hill Investment Advisors - Birch Hill Investment Advisors.



Ad
 ·
Simpli.com/​Hill Investment Advisors



Birch Hill Investment Advisors. Want Quick Answers? Search Simpli!



Searches related tobirch hill investment



birch hill investments inc


birch hill capital


birch hill equity partners


birch hill happenings



birch hill capital partners


birch hill partners


birch equity partners


birch hill farm woodstock vt




12345Next















Search the Web

















© AOL Inc. All Rights Reserved.Privacy
 | Terms of Use
 | Preferences
 | Contact Us
 | Powered by Bing™

Wow.com - Part of the AOL Search Network












Birch Hill Investment Advisors, LLC | Wealth Management Advice








Client Login →24 Federal Street, 10th FloorBoston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300Fax: 617-502-8310
Menu



Home
About Birch Hill
Client Service
Investment Approach
Team
Commentaries
BH News
Contact







Welcome to Birch Hill
Birch Hill manages investments and provides wealth management advice for individuals, families, trusts and institutions.
Successive generations of families have depended on us to manage their wealth – a testimony to the trust we build and the confidence we work to achieve every day.

How We Work With You
Commitment to our Clients
Commitment to our Community

View our most recent commentary:
July 2017 Market View





Birch Hill Investment Advisors LLC
	  24 Federal Street, 10th Floor | Boston, MA 02110Phone: 617-502-8300 | Fax: 617-502-8310 | BirchHillAdvisors.comWebsite Design by Cold Spring Design | Photos by Erb Photography | Legal Notices








 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.


















Bing Places for Business
























































































































Bing
 places for business


Sign in using your




Microsoft Account





Work Account





Google Account





Facebook Account

Don't have an account? Create one.


